Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) To assist with assessing the use of  fish incubation devices as a method
for enhancing or recovering salmon  populations, the State Department of Fish and Wildlife
shall encourage one or  more entities that participate in the salmon and trout enhancement
program described in ORS  496.440 to establish, and fund projects under, a fall Chinook
salmon incubation nursery program for the rearing of fall Chinook salmon on salmon-bearing
or potentially salmon-bearing waterways that are:
(a) Located in Coos County; and
(b) Within 100 miles of the Pacific Ocean.
(2) If one or more  entities establish, and fund projects under, a program described in
subsection (1) of this section:
(a) The department may distribute eggs for use in  the program only in a manner that
ensures that the entity or entities do not plant a combined total  of more than 500,000 eggs
in any calendar year;
(b) The department shall assist the entity or entities by providing  guidance to ensure
that the program is scientifically sound and conducted in accordance  with department poli-
cies; and
(c) The entity or entities shall operate the  program in accordance with the department’s
guidance under paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(3) Under a program described in subsection (1) of this section, an entity:
(a) May only use fish that originate from Coos County  hatcheries to produce fertilized
eggs.
(b) Shall annually report to the department, on or before a date determined by the de-
partment, on the program to describe, at a minimum:
(A) The number of eggs deployed in incubation boxes.
(B) The source and number of brood stock used.
(C) The number and location of fish incubation boxes deployed.
(D) The number of adult fish that return from the incubation boxes.
(E) Any other data collected in association with the program.
(4) This  section does not apply to an incubation nursery program in Coos County that is
implemented pursuant to a cooperative management agreement between the  Coquille Indian
Tribe and the State Fish and Wildlife Commission.
Enrolled Senate Bill 221 (SB 221-B) Page 1
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2040.
SECTION 3.  ORS 496.445 is amended to read:
496.445. In carrying out the salmon and trout enhancement program, the State Fish and Wildlife
Commission shall:
(1) Provide appropriate State Department of Fish  and Wildlife personnel to act as community
advisors to cooperatively develop enhancement projects with citizen volunteers  and to cooperatively
evaluate enhancement projects with the citizens responsible for project implementation.
(2) Provide technical  assistance to citizens responsible for implementation of enhancement
projects.
(3) Coordinate the implementation of enhancement projects with the activities of  department
staff and other agencies.
(4) Provide educational and informational  materials to promote public awareness and involve-
ment in the salmon and trout enhancement program.
(5) Supervise the activities of citizens developing local brood stock for enhancement projects.
(6) Grant funds to citizens for the  implementation of approved enhancement projects from such
moneys as may be available to the commission therefor.
(7) Develop and implement a remote hatchbox program as described in ORS 496.458.
(8) Report annually  to  a committee or interim committee of  the Legislative Assembly  related
to wildlife, in the manner prescribed in ORS 192.245,  on the progress of :
(a) The salmon and trout enhancement program  described in ORS 496.440 .
(b) Any  fall Chinook salmon incubation nursery program described in section 1 of this
2025 Act.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 496.445, as amended by section 3 of this 2025 Act, is amended to read:
496.445. In carrying out the salmon and trout enhancement program, the State Fish and Wildlife
Commission shall:
(1) Provide appropriate State Department of Fish  and Wildlife personnel to act as community
advisors to cooperatively develop enhancement projects with citizen volunteers  and to cooperatively
evaluate enhancement projects with the citizens responsible for project implementation.
(2) Provide technical  assistance to citizens responsible for implementation of enhancement
projects.
(3) Coordinate the implementation of enhancement projects with the activities of  department
staff and other agencies.
(4) Provide educational and informational  materials to promote public awareness and involve-
ment in the salmon and trout enhancement program.
(5) Supervise the activities of citizens developing local brood stock for enhancement projects.
(6) Grant funds to citizens for the  implementation of approved enhancement projects from such
moneys as may be available to the commission therefor.
(7) Develop and implement a remote hatchbox program as described in ORS 496.458.
(8) Report annually to a committee or interim committee of the Legislative  Assembly related to
wildlife, in the manner prescribed in ORS 192.245, on the progress of[ :]
[(a)] the salmon and trout enhancement program described in ORS 496.440.
[(b) Any fall Chinook salmon incubation nursery program described  in section 1 of this 2025
Act.]
SECTION 5.
The amendments to ORS 496.445 by section  4 of this 2025 Act become oper-
ative on January 2, 2040.
SECTION 6. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 221 (SB 221-B) Page 2
Passed by Senate April 1, 2025
Repassed by Senate May 29, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 221 (SB 221-B) Page 3